Hawaii statutes.
§16-43 Ballot handling. In every case
where the ballots are handled by election officials or election employees, from
the time the ballots are delivered to the several precincts to the time they
are returned to the chief election officer or clerk in county elections for
disposition upon completion of the tabulation, they shall be handled in the
presence of not less than two officials assigned in accordance with sections
11-71 and 11-72 or section 16-45. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1975, c 36,
§5(7)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next